Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
In General
§ 57-1-65.
General powers and duties with respect to marketing.

The Mississippi Department of Economic Development shall have the following general powers and duties with respect to marketing:

To promote and stimulate the development of new markets for Mississippi products and goods.

To encourage the establishment of industrial operations to process agricultural and forestry raw products to an end-product stage, ready for sale to the markets of the nation and the world; and

To coordinate all studies in the State of Mississippi concerned with the development of markets for Mississippi products and goods.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 17; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-66.
Production, licensing, etc., of promotional publications, materials, etc.; disposition of proceeds from licensing or sale.

The Department of Economic and Community Development is authorized to produce publications, booklets, brochures, directories, materials and merchandise for the purposes of promoting and marketing Mississippi and assisting businesses through the provision of information in printed form or on computer disk, and to license or sell such items for a fee; however, no public entity or any agency thereof established pursuant to the laws of this state shall be charged a fee for the provision of such items. The funds which are received from the licensing or sale of items described herein shall be paid into a special revolving fund which is hereby established in the State Treasury. Monies in this fund shall be expended as appropriated by the Legislature. Any monies remaining in the special fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 584, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 57-1-67.
Planning and development district offices and directors.

The Mississippi Department of Economic Development, pursuant to contractual agreements with individual planning and development districts, may assign field office staff of the department to a planning and development district office. Planning and development district directors may be consulted by the department as any annual work programs for field office staff so assigned are prepared. Any such work programs shall be designed to address issues and projects of mutual interest to the department and districts and to the accomplishment of their respective economic development missions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-68.
Program of grants to finance and promote local economic development.

The Department of Economic and Community Development, in its discretion, may establish a program of grants to be matched by economic development entities in the state to finance and promote local economic development. Monies committed to the program of grants shall not lapse into the State General Fund at the end of a fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 519, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1995).

§ 57-1-69.
Cooperation with Mississippi Miss Hospitality, Inc., Miss Mississippi Pageant, Inc., and Mrs. Mississippi-America Pageant, Inc.

The Department of Economic and Community Development is authorized to cooperate with Mississippi Miss Hospitality, Inc., in the production of the Mississippi Miss Hospitality Pageant and with Miss Mississippi Pageant, Inc., in the production of the Miss Mississippi Pageant, and with Mrs. Mississippi-America Pageant, Inc., in the production of the Mrs. Mississippi Pageant, and in defraying expenses incurred by Miss Hospitality and Miss Mississippi and Mrs. Mississippi when making official appearances to represent this state, by expending in furtherance of such purposes any money appropriated or otherwise made available to the department therefor. Money received by the department for such purposes shall be deposited into a special fund which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Unexpended amounts remaining in such special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in such special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 72; Laws, 1990, ch. 401, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 57-1-70.
Miss Mississippi, Miss Hospitality and Mrs. Mississippi as official nongovernmental representatives of state.

The person selected as Miss Mississippi in the annual pageant sponsored by Miss Mississippi Pageant, Inc., and the person selected as Miss Hospitality in the annual Mississippi Miss Hospitality Pageant, and the person selected as Mrs. Mississippi in the annual Mrs. Mississippi Pageant, shall be the official nongovernmental representatives of the State of Mississippi, and shall be the only persons selected in pageants in the state who are recognized by the state as its official representatives in appearances made at functions, ceremonies or other activities on behalf of the state or for the promotion or goodwill of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.